Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.078

Board to familiarize government officials and public with chapter provisions.

In order to enhance competition for grants and loans and the quality of projects for which loans and grants are sought, the board shall take such reasonable measures as are necessary to familiarize government officials and members of the public with the provisions of this chapter, particularly the board's authority to make grants and loans.

[ 1985 c 446 s 5.]